Utah statutes.
17-25-6.   Identification of constables -- Uniform requirements.

(1)  While performing a duty described in Section 17-25-1, a constable shall prominently display a badge or other visible form of credentials and identification identifying:

(a)  a person as a constable;

(b)  the person's name; and

(c)  the county or municipality for which the constable is appointed.

(2)  If a constable serves process, the constable shall:

(a)  verbally communicate to the person being served that the constable is a constable; and

(b)  print on the first page of each document served:

(i)  the constable's name and identification as a constable;

(ii)  the county or municipality for which the constable is appointed; and

(iii)  a business phone number for the constable.

(3)  If a constable wears a uniform, the uniform shall be clearly marked with the word "constable" on the uniform shirt and, if applicable, the jacket.



Amended by Chapter 48, 2012 General Session

